Massachusetts, session 194th, H2341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 3 of the charter of the town of Acushnet, as on file in the office of the
archivist of the commonwealth in accordance with Section 12 of Chapter 43B of the General
Laws, is hereby amended by striking out Section 3-1-2 in its entirety.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
Or take any action relative thereto.
of 1